Utah statutes.
20A-13-303.   Filling vacancies.

If there is a vacancy in the office of presidential elector because of death, refusal to act, failure to attend, ineligibility, or any other cause, the political party represented by the elector who caused the vacancy shall immediately fill the vacancy.

